Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1756.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1511 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1511. [Electricity] Service supplied to certain organizations.Any public utility company supplying [electric] service shall, upon application, permit a volunteer fire company, a nonprofit rescue squad or ambulance service or a nonprofit [senior citizen] older adult center to elect to have its [electric] service rendered pursuant to a rate schedule which provides equivalent charges for such service as residential rates [upon execution of a contract for a minimum term of one year].1234567891011121314151617 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1756PN2164 - 2 - 1